Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.050

Powers and duties of acting governor.

Every provision of law in relation to the powers and duties of the governor, and in relation to acts and duties to be performed by others towards him or her, extends to the person performing for the time being the duties of governor.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5015; 1965 c 8 s 43.06.050. Prior: 1890 p 629 s 4; RRS s 10986.]